Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 5, Chapter 148, O.S.L.
2024 (16 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 305), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 305. 1. Recording an unfair service agreement is
prohibited. No person shall record or cause to be recorded an
unfair service agreement or notice or memorandum thereof in this
state;
2. A county clerk's office shall refuse to accept for
recordation an unfair service agreement or notice or memorandum;
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1177 Page 1

3. In the event that a county clerk does accidentally record an
unfair service agreement or notice or memorandum, the county clerk
shall incur no liability for doing so; and
4. If an unfair service agreement or notice or memorandum is
recorded in this state, it shall not provide actual or constructive
notice against an otherwise bona fide purchaser or, creditor, or
title company; and
5. If an unfair service agreement or notice or memorandum is
recorded in this state it shall be considered void.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate






ENGR. H. B. NO. 1177 Page 2